Nevada, session 83, AB232.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 286.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.481 A member shall not be credited with service for:
1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 286.385, leave of
absence without pay;
2. Overtime work;
3. Employment in a position which does not qualify the
member for participation in the System;
4. [More] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 286.501, more
than 1 day within a day, 1 month within a month, or 1 year of
service in any 12-month period; or
5. Any period for which compensation is not received by the
member unless specifically otherwise provided in this chapter.
Sec. 2. NRS 286.501 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.501 Each member who is employed by a school district for
less than 12 months per school year and each member of the
professional staff of the Nevada System of Higher Education
employed for the academic year who is employed for less than 12
months per fiscal year is credited with service as follows:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
1. Service is credited on the basis of a full year if the member
works [full-time for the full] at least 900 hours over the course of
not less than 8 calendar months in a school year.
2. Employment for [a part of] less than 900 hours over the
course of not less than 8 calendar months in a school year is
credited on a ratio of one and one-third days for each day worked,
but credit may not be given in advance or until the appropriate
period has expired.
3. A full year of service is not credited until the full 12-month
period has expired. If the employee begins work under a new
contract before the expiration of the 12-month period for the old
contract, credit must be granted for the period of overlap, as
certified by the school district, at the first period in which there is a
lapse in service.
4. Service credit under this section must be computed
according to:
(a) The school year for school district employees.
(b) The fiscal year for members of the professional staff of the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
5. A member receives full credit while on sabbatical leave if
the public employer certifies that the compensation and
contributions reported for the member are the same as if the member
were employed full-time. If the employer does not so certify, the
member receives credit in the proportion that the member’s actual
compensation bears to the member’s previous compensation.
 No member may receive less credit under this section than was
provided under the law in force when the credit was earned.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)